Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB353.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2005-I. Public institution of higher education policy on antisemitism.(a) Duty to adopt.--In order to receive State funding, a public institution of higher education must adopt a clear and understandable written policy prohibiting antisemitism among faculty, staff and students.(b) Required contents.--A public institution of higher education shall adopt, as part of its code of conduct relating 1234567891011121314151617181920 to discrimination and harassment, a definition of the terms "discrimination" and "harassment," which definitions shall include antisemitism and examples of antisemitic activity.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Antisemitism." A certain perception of Jewish individuals, which may be expressed as hatred toward Jewish individuals, including rhetorical or physical manifestations directed toward Jewish or non-Jewish individuals or their property, or toward Jewish community institutions and religious facilities."Public institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A.(2) A rural regional college established under Article XIX-G.(3) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A.(4) A State-related institution as defined in section 2001-C.(5) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0353PN0307 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122